New York, session 2025-2026, S10174.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. 1. The legislature hereby 2 finds that a significant portion of individuals served within New York 3 state systems present with co-occurring disorders (COD), defined as the 4 coexistence of a mental health condition and a substance use disorder, 5 as reflected in available state and federal data and reporting. 6 2. The legislature further finds that the New York state office of 7 mental health (OMH), the New York state office of addiction services and 8 supports (OASAS), the New York state department of health (DOH), and the 9 New York state education department (NYSED) operate within systems that 10 remain structurally separate in policy, funding, and service delivery, 11 including but not limited to differences in eligibility criteria, 12 licensing and regulatory requirements, reimbursement structures, and 13 program oversight. 14 3. The legislature further finds that such separation results in frag- 15 mented access to care, disruptions in treatment continuity, and incon- 16 sistent outcomes across populations and settings, including barriers to 17 entry into services, limitations of concurrent or integrated treatment, 18 and gaps in care transitions across providers and systems. 19 4. The legislature further finds that, despite substantial invest- 20 ments, there is insufficient alignment across OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED 21 to ensure integrated, person-centered care related to COD. 22 5. The legislature further finds that there is no single, enforceable 23 statewide framework governing prevention, identification, treatment, and 24 recovery related to COD. 25 6. The legislature therefore declares that a coordinated, cross-system 26 approach is necessary to align policy, funding, service delivery, and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15698-01-6 S. 10174 2 1 curriculum, and that a time-limited, outcome-driven panel is required to 2 establish such a framework. 3 § 2. Establishment of the blue ribbon panel on co-occurring disorders. 4 1. There is hereby established a temporary body to be known as the "blue 5 ribbon panel on co-occurring disorders," hereinafter referred to as the 6 "panel". 7 2. The panel shall be charged with developing a comprehensive, 8 enforceable statewide framework for the integration of mental health and 9 substance use services across the continuum related to COD, including 10 alignment across OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED. 11 § 3. Duration. 1. The panel shall convene within sixty days of the 12 effective date of this act. 13 2. The panel shall operate for a period not to exceed nine months from 14 the date of its initial convening for purposes of developing and submit- 15 ting its final report. 16 3. The panel shall continue in effect for an additional period of not 17 less than sixty days following submission of its final report and 18 receipt of the joint agency response and any revised response required 19 pursuant to section ten of this act for the purpose of reviewing the 20 agency response required pursuant to section ten of this act. 21 4. The panel shall terminate upon completion of such review. 22 5. The panel may extend its duration for a period not to exceed ninety 23 days upon a majority vote of its members, for the purpose of completing 24 its final report or fulfilling its responsibilities pursuant to this 25 act. 26 § 4. Membership. 1. The panel shall consist of not fewer than fifteen 27 and not more than twenty-one members with demonstrated expertise in COD 28 across the continuum of care and shall include a cross-section of stake- 29 holders, including but not limited to: 30 a. individuals with lived experience; 31 b. family members; 32 c. licensed mental health providers; 33 d. substance use disorder treatment providers; 34 e. providers delivering integrated care; 35 f. prevention and school-based professionals; 36 g. peer support and recovery representatives; 37 h. at least one representative of the OMH, including expertise in 38 licensing, regulatory, and program oversight functions; 39 i. at least one representative of the OASAS, including expertise in 40 licensing, regulatory, and program oversight functions; 41 j. at least one representative of the DOH, including expertise in 42 licensing, regulatory, and program oversight functions; 43 k. at least one representative of the NYSED with expertise in curric- 44 ulum development and school-based mental health and substance use 45 prevention; 46 l. health system representatives; 47 m. payers and managed care organizations; 48 n. workforce development and academic partners; 49 o. at least one representative of the New York state conference of 50 local mental hygiene directors (NYSCLMHD); and 51 p. individuals with expertise in state program administration, budget- 52 ing, and financing of mental health and substance use services. 53 2. Members of the panel shall be appointed as follows: 54 a. seven members appointed by the governor; 55 b. four members appointed by the temporary president of the senate; 56 c. four members appointed by the speaker of the assembly; S. 10174 3 1 d. three members appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and 2 e. three members appointed by the minority leader of the assembly. 3 3. Appointments shall, to the extent practicable, reflect the catego- 4 ries of representation set forth in subdivision one of this section, 5 including individuals with lived experience, family members, providers, 6 prevention and school-based professionals, peers, and representatives of 7 relevant state agencies, health systems, payers, and academic insti- 8 tutions. 9 4. At least three members shall be individuals with lived experience 10 or family members. 11 5. Appointments to the panel shall ensure representation across 12 geographic regions and service settings. 13 6. The panel may establish subcommittees as necessary to carry out its 14 responsibilities. 15 § 5. Scope of work. 1. The panel shall examine and develop recommenda- 16 tions across the full continuum of care related to COD, including: 17 a. prevention and early intervention, including curriculum development 18 and implementation within school systems; 19 b. youth and school-based systems; 20 c. clinical treatment services; 21 d. crisis response systems; 22 e. recovery and peer supports; and 23 f. housing and services for justice-involved populations. 24 2. The panel shall specifically address: 25 a. alignment of policies, regulations, and service delivery expecta- 26 tions across OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED; 27 b. barriers to integrated care across settings and populations; 28 c. workforce capacity, training, and ongoing support needs; 29 d. data collection, outcome measurement, and quality improvement; and 30 e. funding structures and reimbursement models, including Medicaid, 31 state funding, and federal funding streams, that impact integration. 32 3. The panel shall engage OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED throughout its 33 work to ensure ongoing input, coordination, and alignment with agency 34 operations and implementation considerations. 35 § 6. Required deliverables. The panel shall produce a final report 36 that includes, but is not limited to: 37 1. statewide standards for integration related to COD; 38 2. a unified operational framework; 39 3. a funding alignment strategy across state and federal funding 40 streams; 41 4. an implementation roadmap; and 42 5. an accountability and enforcement framework. 43 § 7. Reporting. 1. The panel shall submit its final report to the 44 governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the 45 assembly. 46 2. Such report shall be submitted no later than nine months following 47 the panel's initial convening. 48 3. The report shall be made publicly available. 49 § 8. Administrative support. OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED shall provide 50 administrative support to the panel. 51 § 9. Implementation. OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED shall review the 52 panel's recommendations and identify actions necessary for implementa- 53 tion. 54 § 10. Agency response and implementation plan. 1. Within forty-five 55 days of the public release of the panel's final report, OMH, OASAS, DOH, 56 and NYSED shall jointly submit a single, written response reflecting a S. 10174 4 1 coordinated position across such agencies to the governor, the temporary 2 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and the panel. 3 2. Such response shall: 4 a. identify which recommendations are accepted; 5 b. provide justification for any not accepted; 6 c. outline a coordinated implementation plan; and 7 d. identify statutory, regulatory, or budgetary changes required, 8 including state and federal funding. 9 3. If the panel determines that the joint agency response does not 10 adequately address the recommendations set forth in the panel's final 11 report, OMH, OASAS, DOH, and NYSED shall submit a revised response with- 12 in thirty days addressing the deficiencies identified by the panel. 13 4. The agencies shall, in consultation with the panel, develop a joint 14 implementation plan reflecting agreed-upon actions, timelines, and 15 responsible entities. 16 5. If the agencies do not accept material recommendations, the panel 17 shall identify such recommendations and may submit proposed legislative 18 and budgetary actions to the governor, the temporary president of the 19 senate, and the speaker of the assembly for consideration. 20 § 11. This act shall take effect immediately.